Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1605
Department; administer act; personnel.

The department shall administer the Private Postsecondary Career School Act and for the purposes thereof shall employ such personnel as may be necessary. To effectuate the purposes of the act, the department may request from any department, division, board, bureau, commission, or other agency of the state, and the same shall provide, such information as will enable the department to exercise properly its powers and perform its duties under the act.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 5;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2805;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 5.